California statutes. Elections Code
(3) “Fault” means a step, process, or data definition in any software or firmware in a voting system that is incorrect under the manufacturer’s program specification or applicable law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19202 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 14.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19211.

(a) Prior to publishing his or her decision to certify, conditionally approve, or withhold certification of a voting system or part of a voting system, the Secretary of State shall provide for a 30-day public review period and conduct a public hearing to give persons interested an opportunity to review testing and examination reports and express their views for or against certification or conditional approval of the voting system.

 (b) The Secretary of State shall give notice of the public review period and hearing in the manner prescribed in Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in Sacramento County.
 The Secretary of State shall also provide notice of the hearing on his or her Internet Web site. The Secretary of State shall transmit written notice of the hearing, at least 14 days prior to the public review period and hearing, to each county elections official, to any person that the Secretary of State believes will be interested in the public review period and hearing, and to any person who requests, in writing, notice of the public review period and hearing.

 (c) The decision of the Secretary of State to certify, conditionally approve, or withhold certification of a voting system or part of a voting system shall be in writing and shall state the findings of the Secretary of State. The decision shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19204 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 16.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19212.

(a) (1) No later than 10 business days after the Secretary of State certifies or conditionally approves the use of a new or updated voting system, the vendor or county seeking certification or approval of the voting system shall cause an exact copy of the approved source code for each component of the voting system, including complete build and configuration instructions and related documents for compiling the source code into object code, to be transferred directly from the voting system testing agency that evaluated the voting system and is approved by the Secretary of State, and deposited into an approved escrow facility.

(2) No later than 10 business days after the Secretary of State certifies or conditionally approves a new or updated
 ballot marking system, the vendor or county seeking certification or approval of the ballot marking system shall cause an exact copy of the approved source code for each component of the ballot marking system, including complete build and configuration instructions and related documents for compiling the source code into object code, to be deposited into an approved escrow facility.

(b) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations relating to all of the following:

(1) The definition of source code components of a voting system or ballot marking system, including source code for all firmware and software of the voting system or ballot marking system. Firmware and software shall include commercial off-the-shelf or other third-party firmware and software that is available and able to be disclosed by the vendor or county seeking certification or approval of a voting system or ballot
 marking system.

(2) Specifications for the escrow facility, including security and environmental specifications necessary for the preservation of the voting system or ballot marking system source codes.

(3) Procedures for submitting voting system or ballot marking system source codes.

(4) Criteria for access to voting system or ballot marking system source codes.

(5) Requirements for the applicant to include in the materials deposited in escrow build and configuration instructions and documents so that a neutral third party may create, from the source codes in escrow, executable object codes identical to the code installed on certified or conditionally approved voting systems or ballot marking systems.

(c) The Secretary of State shall have reasonable access to the materials placed in escrow, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) In the course of an investigation or prosecution regarding vote counting or ballot marking equipment or procedures.

(2) Upon a finding by the Secretary of State that an escrow facility or escrow company is unable or unwilling to maintain materials in escrow in compliance with this section.

(3) In order to fulfill the provisions of this chapter related to the examination and certification or conditional approval of voting systems or ballot marking systems.

(4) In order to verify that the software on a voting system is identical to the certified or conditionally approved version.

(5) For any other purpose deemed necessary to fulfill the provisions of this code or Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.

(d) The Secretary of State may seek injunctive relief requiring the elections officials, approved escrow facility, or any vendor or manufacturer of a voting system or part of a voting system to comply with this section and related regulations. Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County.

(e) This section applies to all elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 10.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19213.

Within 60 days after the completion of the examination of a voting system, the Secretary of State shall make publicly available a report stating whether the voting system has been certified or conditionally approved, or whether certification has been withheld. The report shall also contain a written or printed description and drawings and photographs that clearly identify the machine or device and its mechanical operation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19207 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 20.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19214.

Within 10 days after issuing and filing a certification decision and associated testing reports, the Secretary of State shall make available to the public a full and complete copy of the certification report and all associated documentation, except that portions of the report or documentation that contain information that the Secretary of State determines to be confidential or proprietary shall not be made publicly available. The Secretary of State shall also notify the board of supervisors and elections official of each county of the availability of the report and associated documentation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19209 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 22.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.

If a voting system or a part of a voting system has been certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State, the vendor or, in cases where the system is publicly owned, the jurisdiction shall notify the Secretary of State and all local elections officials who use the system in writing of any defect, fault, or failure of the hardware, software, or firmware of any voting system or part of any voting system created or manufactured by the vendor, or supplied by the vendor to any jurisdiction, within 30 calendar days after the vendor learns of the defect, fault, or failure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 11.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19216.

If a voting system or a part of a voting system has been certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State, it shall not be changed or modified until the Secretary of State has been notified in writing and has determined that the change or modification does not impair its accuracy and efficiency sufficient to require a reexamination and recertification, or conditional approval, pursuant to this article. The Secretary of State may adopt rules and regulations governing the procedures to be followed in making his or her determination as to whether the change or modification impairs accuracy or efficiency.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19213 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 27.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19217.

The Secretary of State may seek injunctive and administrative relief if a voting system or a part of a voting system has been compromised by the addition or deletion of hardware, software, or firmware without prior approval or is defective due to a known hardware, software, or firmware defect, fault, or failure that has not been disclosed pursuant to Section 19210 or 19215.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19214 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 28.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.

(a) The Secretary of State may seek all of the following relief for an unauthorized change in hardware, software, or firmware in a voting system certified or conditionally approved in California:

(1) A civil penalty from the offending party or parties, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. For purposes of this subdivision, each voting system component found to contain the unauthorized hardware, software, or firmware shall be considered a separate violation. A penalty imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be apportioned 50 percent to the county in which the violation occurred, if applicable, and 50 percent to the office of the Secretary of State for
 purposes of bolstering voting systems security efforts.

(2) Immediate commencement of proceedings to withdraw certification or conditional approval for the voting system in question.

(3) Prohibiting the manufacturer or vendor of a voting system from doing elections-related business in the state for one, two, or three years.

(4) Refund of all moneys paid by a local agency for a voting system or a part of a voting system that is compromised by an unauthorized change or modification, whether or not the voting system has been used in an election.

(5) Any other remedial actions authorized by law to prevent unjust enrichment of the offending party.

(b) (1) The Secretary of State may seek all of the following relief for a known but undisclosed defect, fault, or failure in a voting system or part of a voting system certified or conditionally approved in California:

(A) Refund of all moneys paid by a local agency for a voting system or part of a voting system that is defective due to a known but undisclosed defect, fault, or failure, whether or not the voting system has been used in an election.

(B) A civil penalty from the offending party or parties, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation. For purposes of this subdivision, each defect, fault, or failure shall be considered a separate violation. A defect, fault, or failure
 constitutes a single violation regardless of the number of voting system units in which the defect, fault, or failure is found.

(C) In addition to any other penalties or remedies established by this section, the offending party or parties shall be liable in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day after the applicable deadline established in Section 19215 until the required disclosure is filed with the Secretary of State.

(2) A penalty imposed pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(c) Before seeking any measure of relief under this section, the Secretary of State shall hold a public hearing. The Secretary of State shall give notice of the hearing in the
 manner prescribed by Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in Sacramento County. The Secretary of State also shall transmit written notice of the hearing, at least 30 days prior to the hearing, to each county elections official, the offending party or parties, a person that the Secretary of State believes will be interested in the hearing, and a person who requests, in writing, notice of the hearing.

(d) The decision of the Secretary of State to seek relief under this section shall be in writing and state his or her findings. The decision shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19214.5 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 29.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19219.

(a) The Secretary of State may seek injunctive relief requiring an elections official, or any vendor or manufacturer of a voting machine, voting system, or vote tabulating device, to comply with the requirements of this code, the regulations of the Secretary of State, and the specifications for voting machines, voting devices, vote tabulating devices, and any software used for each, including the programs and procedures for vote tabulating and testing.

(b) Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19215 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 30.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Voting System Testing Agencies [19220. - 19223.]

19220.

For purposes of this division, “state-approved testing agency” means a person or entity that is authorized by the Secretary of State to conduct the testing and examination of a voting system in connection with certification or conditional approval of the voting system pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 35.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19221.

The Secretary of State shall do all of the following:

(a) Publish requirements for the approval of state-approved testing agencies that are authorized to conduct the testing and examination of voting systems. Until the requirements are published, federally accredited voting system laboratories shall be used to conduct testing and examination.

(b) Approve and publish a list of authorized state-approved testing agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 35.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19222.

The person, corporation, or public agency applying for certification of a voting system is responsible for all costs associated with the testing of the voting system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 35.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19223.

The Secretary of State shall use a state-approved testing agency or expert technicians to examine and test voting systems or parts of voting systems proposed for use or sale in this state. He or she shall furnish a complete report of the findings of the examination and testing to the Governor and the Attorney General.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19203 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 15.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Inspection of Certified and Conditionally Approved Voting Systems [19230. - 19233.]

19230.

(a) The elections official of any county, city, or city and county using a voting system shall inspect the machines or devices at least once every two years to determine their accuracy. Any county, city, or city and county using leased or rented equipment shall determine if the equipment has been inspected for accuracy within the last two years before using it for any election. The inspection shall be made in accordance with regulations adopted and promulgated by the Secretary of State. The elections official shall certify the results of the inspection to the Secretary of State.

(b) An individual shall not allow an agent of a law enforcement agency to access, disrupt, modify, or
 take possession of
 certified voting technology or a portion thereof unless authorized by a court order. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit an individual, in accordance with a written agreement between the elections official conducting the election and a law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 18544 or Section 18545, to permit agents of that agency to provide logistical, transportation, or security support during the voting period, on election day, or during the canvass of the vote. For purposes of this subdivision, “certified voting technology” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 17600.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “law enforcement agency” means all of the following:

(1) Any law enforcement agency, department, or other
 entity of the state or any political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(2) Any law enforcement agency of another state.

(3) Any federal law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 10, Sec. 10.   (SB 73)   Effective May 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19231.

(a) If the Secretary of State has reason to believe that a local inspection of equipment is not adequate, he or she may cause the equipment to be reexamined, at any time prior to six months before a statewide election, to ensure that the voting system or parts of the voting system perform to adopted standards and tabulate votes accurately.

 (b) For the purpose of reexamining voting equipment, the Secretary of State may use state-approved testing agencies or expert technicians at the cost of the elections official.

 (c) The Secretary of State shall furnish a complete report of the findings
 to the Governor, to the Attorney General, to each county elections official, to the chairpersons of the elections committees of the Assembly and Senate, and to the manufacturer of the equipment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19221 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 36.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19232.

The Secretary of State shall review voting systems periodically to determine if they are defective, obsolete, or otherwise unacceptable. The Secretary of State has the right to withdraw his or her certification or conditional approval previously granted under this chapter of any voting system or part of a voting system should it be defective or prove unacceptable after such review. Six months’ notice shall be given before withdrawing certification or conditional approval unless the Secretary of State for good cause shown makes a determination that a shorter notice period is necessary. Any withdrawal by the Secretary of State of his or her previous certification or conditional approval of a voting system or part of a
 voting system shall not be effective as to any election conducted within six months of that withdrawal.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19222 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 37.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19233.

The Secretary of State shall conduct random audits of the software installed on direct recording electronic voting systems, as defined in Section 19271, to ensure that the installed software is identical to the software that has been approved for use on that voting system. The Secretary of State shall take steps to ensure that the process for conducting random audits does not intentionally cause a direct recording electronic voting system to become more vulnerable to any unauthorized changes to the software that has been approved for its use.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19223 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 38.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Accessible Voting Systems [19240. - 19246.]

19240.

It is the intent of the Legislature that California voting system standards and elections comply with the provisions of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.) that require voting systems be accessible for individuals with disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for access and participation, including privacy and independence, as provided to other voters who are not disabled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 34.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19241.

As used in this article:

(a) “Access” means the ability to receive, use, select, and manipulate data and operate controls included in voting technology and systems.

(b) “Nonvisual” means synthesized speech, braille, and other output methods that do not require sight.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19226 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 41.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19242.

(a) The Secretary of State shall adopt and publish rules and regulations governing any voting technology and systems used by the state or any political subdivision that provide voters with disabilities the access required under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).

(b) At each polling place, at least one voting unit certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State shall provide voters with disabilities the access required under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).

(c) A local agency is not required to comply with subdivision (b) in an election in which a candidate for federal office does not appear on the ballot unless sufficient funds are available to implement that provision. Funds received from the proceeds of the Voting Modernization Bond Act of 2002 (Article 5 (commencing with Section 19250)), from federal funds made available to purchase new voting systems, or from any other source except the General Fund, shall be used for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 35.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19243.

In requiring access for voters with disabilities pursuant to this article, the Secretary of State shall obtain recommendations from representatives of blind consumer organizations, experts in accessible software and hardware design, and any other individual or organization the Secretary of State determines to be appropriate.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19227.5 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 43.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19244.

Compliance with this article in regard to voting technology and systems purchased prior to the effective date of this article shall be achieved at the time of procurement of an upgrade or replacement of existing voting equipment or systems.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19228 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 44.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19245.

(a) A person injured by a violation of this article may maintain an action for injunctive relief to enforce this article.

(b) An action for injunctive relief shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues.

(c) For purposes of this section, a cause of action for a continuing violation accrues at the time of the latest violation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19229 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 45.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19246.

This article does not apply to voting by vote by mail ballot.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19229.5 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 46.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Voting Modernization Bond Act of 2002 (Shelley-Hertzberg Act) [19250. - 19266.]

19250.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Voting Modernization Bond Act of 2002 (Shelley-Hertzberg Act).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19230 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 48.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19251.

The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19231 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 49.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19252.

As used in this article:

(a) “Board” means the Voting Modernization Board, established pursuant to Section 19256.

(b) “Bond” means a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(c) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(d) “Committee” means the Voting Modernization Finance Committee,
 established pursuant to Section 19253.

(e) “Fund” means the Voting Modernization Fund, created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19254.

(f) “Voting system” means any voting machine, voting device, or vote tabulating device that does not use prescored punch card ballots.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19232 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 50.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19253.

(a) The Voting Modernization Finance Committee is hereby established for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this article.

(b) The committee consists of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer, or their designated representatives, all of whom shall serve without compensation, and a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(c) For purposes of this article, the Voting
 Modernization Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19233 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 51.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19254.

(a) The committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the state, in the aggregate amount of not more than one hundred eighty-nine million five hundred seventy thousand dollars ($189,570,000), excluding refunding bonds, in the manner provided herein for the purpose of creating a fund to assist counties in the purchase of updated voting systems.

(b) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Voting Modernization Fund, which is hereby established.

(c) A county is eligible to apply to the board for fund money if it meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The county has purchased a new voting system after January 1, 1999, and is continuing to make payments on that system on the date that this article becomes effective.

(2) The county matches fund moneys at a ratio of one dollar ($1) of county moneys for every three dollars ($3) of fund moneys.

(3) The county has not previously requested fund money for the purchase of a new voting system. An application for expanding an existing system or components related to a previously certified or conditionally approved application shall be accepted.

(d) (1) Fund moneys shall only be used to purchase systems certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State.

(2) A county may use fund moneys to contract and pay for the following:

(A) Research and development of a new voting system that has not been certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State and uses only nonproprietary software and firmware with disclosed source code, except for unmodified commercial off-the-shelf software and firmware, as defined in
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19209.

(B) Manufacture of the minimum number of voting system units reasonably necessary for either of the following purposes:

(i) To test and seek certification or conditional approval for the voting system pursuant to Sections 19210 to 19214, inclusive.

(ii) To test and demonstrate the capabilities of the voting system in a pilot program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of, and subdivision (c) of, Section 19209.

(3) Fund moneys shall not be used to purchase a voting system that uses prescored punch card ballots.

(e) A
 voting system purchased using bond funds that does not require a voter to directly mark on the ballot must produce, at the time the voter votes their ballot or at the time the polls are closed, a paper version or representation of the voted ballot or of all the ballots cast on a unit of the voting system. The paper version shall not be provided to the voter but shall be retained by elections officials for use during the 1-percent manual recount or other recount, audit, or contest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 6.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19255.

The Legislature may amend subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 19254 and Section 19256 by a statute, passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the respective journals, by not less than two-thirds of the membership in each house concurring, if the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purposes of, this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19234.5 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 53.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19256.

The Voting Modernization Board is hereby established and designated the “board” for purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, and for purposes of administering the Voting Modernization Fund. The board consists of five members, three selected by the Governor and two selected by the Secretary of State. The board shall have the authority to reject any application for fund money it deems inappropriate, excessive, or that does not comply with the intent of this article. A county whose application is rejected shall be allowed to submit an amended application.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19235 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 54.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19257.

(a) All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the state is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof. The bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be repaid within 10 years from the date they are issued.

(b) There shall be collected annually, in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as
 provided herein. All officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

(c) On the dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal of, and interest on, the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned to the General Fund all of the money in the fund, not in excess of the principal of, and interest on, any bonds then due and payable. If the money so returned on the remittance dates is less than the principal and interest then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned to the General Fund out of the fund as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from the dates of maturity until returned, at the same rate of interest as borne by the
 bonds, compounded semiannually. This subdivision does not grant any lien on the fund or the moneys therein to holders of any bonds issued under this article. However, this subdivision shall not apply in the case of any debt service that is payable from the proceeds of any refunding bonds. For purposes of this subdivision, “debt service” means the principal (whether due at maturity, by redemption, or acceleration), premium, if any, or interest payable on any date to any series of bonds.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19236 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 55.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19258.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 19259, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19237 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 56.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19259.

For purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. All moneys made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19238 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 57.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19260.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this article. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. The board shall execute whatever documents are required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19239 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 58.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19261.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds be issued or sold at any one time.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19240 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 59.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19262.

(a) The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times established by the Treasurer.

(b) Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par value thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19241 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 60.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19263.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided by this article, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19242 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 61.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19264.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval of the voters for the issuance of bonds under this article includes approval for the issuance of bonds issued to refund bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19243 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 62.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19265.
